Hawaii statutes.
§6E-3 Historic preservation program.
There is established within the department a division to administer a
comprehensive historic preservation program, which shall include but not be
limited to the following:

(1) Development of an ongoing program of historical,
architectural, and archaeological research and development, including surveys,
excavations, scientific recording, interpretation, signage, and publications on
the State's historical and cultural resources;

(2) Acquisition of historic or cultural properties,
real or personal, in fee or in any lesser interest, by gift, purchase,
condemnation, devise, bequest, land exchange, or other means; preservation,
restoration, administration, or transference of the property; and the charging
of reasonable admissions to that property;

(3) Development of a statewide survey and inventory
to identify and document historic properties, aviation artifacts, and burial
sites, including all those owned by the State and the counties;

(4) Preparation of information for the Hawaii
register of historic places and listing on the national register of historic
places;

(5) Preparation, review, and revisions of a state
historic preservation plan, including budget requirements and land use
recommendations;

(6) Application for and receipt of gifts, grants,
technical assistance, and other funding from public and private sources for the
purposes of this chapter;

(7) Provision of technical and financial assistance
to the counties and public and private agencies involved in historic
preservation activities;

(8) Coordination of activities of the counties in
accordance with the state plan for historic preservation;

(9) Stimulation of public interest in historic
preservation, including the development and implementation of interpretive
programs for historic properties listed on or eligible for the Hawaii register
of historic places;

(10) Coordination of the evaluation and management of
burial sites as provided in section 6E-43;

(11) Acquisition of burial sites in fee or in any
lesser interest, by gift, purchase, condemnation, devise, bequest, land
exchange, or other means, to be held in trust;

(12) Submittal of an annual report to the governor and
legislature detailing the accomplishments of the year, recommendations for
changes in the state plan or future programs relating to historic preservation,
and an accounting of all income, expenditures, and the fund balance of the
Hawaii historic preservation special fund;

(13) Regulation of archaeological activities
throughout the State;

(14) Employment of sufficient professional and
technical staff for the purposes of this chapter which shall be in accordance
with chapter 76;

(15) The charging of fees to be determined by the
department that are proportional to the nature and complexity of the projects
or services provided, and adjusted from time to time to ensure that the
proceeds, together with all other fines, income, and penalties collected under
this chapter, do not surpass the annual operating costs of the comprehensive
historic preservation program;

(16) Adoption of rules in accordance with chapter 91,
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

(17) Development and adoption, in consultation with
the office of Hawaiian affairs native historic preservation council, of rules
governing permits for access by native Hawaiians and Hawaiians to cultural,
historic, and pre-contact sites and monuments. [L 1976, c 104, pt of §2; am L
1987, c 330, §1; am L 1989, c 324, §2; am L 1990, c 306, §5; am L 1991, c 108,
§2; am L 1993, c 323, §2; am L 1996, c 97, §4; am L 1997, c 207, §1; am L 1998,
c 311, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2006, c 300, §2; am L 2012, c 150, §1;
am L 2014, c 181, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next